Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1226.
do enact as follows:AB1226,11Section 1. 183.0122 (2) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1226,2,42183.0122 (2) (a) (intro.) Except as provided under pars. (c) and (d) to (e), the 3department shall collect the following fees when the records described in this 4paragraph are delivered to the department for filing:AB1226,25Section 2. 183.0122 (2) (e) of the statutes is created to read:AB1226,2,76183.0122 (2) (e) 1. In this paragraph, “youth entrepreneur” means an 7individual who is all of the following:AB1226,2,98a. An organizer of a limited liability company or who will be a member of the 9limited liability company upon its formation.AB1226,2,1010b. At least 12 years of age but less than 18 years of age.AB1226,2,12112. The department may not collect a fee for filing articles of organization if all 12of the following apply:AB1226,2,1413a. All members of the limited liability company, upon its formation, are youth 14entrepreneurs.AB1226,2,1715b. If the limited liability company is formed by any organizer who will not 16become a member of the limited liability company upon its formation, all such 17organizers of the limited liability company are youth entrepreneurs.AB1226,318Section 3. Initial applicability.AB1226,2,2019(1) This act first applies to articles of organization filed on the effective date of 20this subsection.AB1226,421Section 4. Effective date.AB1226,3,21(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 2nd month beginning after 2publication.AB1226,3,33